North Carolina statutes. Chapter 54. Cooperative Organizations.
Article 18. Powers and Duties.

§ 54-124.
Nature of business authorized.

An association created under this Subchapter shall have power to conduct any agricultural, housing, horticultural, forestry, dairy, mercantile, mining, manufacturing, telephone, electric light, power, storage, refrigeration, flume, irrigation, water, sewerage, or mechanical business, or purchase, maintain and use fire-fighting equipment, or conduct any other lawful business, on the mutual plan.

History.

1915, c. 144, s. 8; C.S., s. 5255; 1925, c. 179, ss. 1, 3; 1949, c. 1042, s. 2; 1955, c. 746, s. 2; 1985, c. 542, s. 5.

§ 54-125.
Amendment of articles.

The association may amend its articles of incorporation by a majority vote of its shareholders at any regular shareholders’ meeting, or any special shareholders’ meeting called for that purpose, on 10 days’ notice to the shareholders. The power to amend shall include the power to increase or diminish the amount of capital stock and the number of shares: Provided, the amount of the capital stock shall not be diminished below the amount of the paid-up capital at the time the amendment is adopted. Within 30 days after the adoption of an amendment to its articles of incorporation, an association shall cause a copy of such amendment adopted to be recorded in the office of the Secretary of State and of the register of deeds of the county where the principal place of business is located.

History.

1915, c. 144, s. 7; C.S., s. 5256; 1967, c. 823, s. 14.

§ 54-126.
Apportionment of earnings.

The net earnings or losses shall be apportioned among the members in accordance with the ratio which each member’s patronage during the period involved bears to total patronage by all members during the period. “Patronage” means amount of purchases, sales, business, labor, wages or other similar criteria.

History.

1915, c. 144, s. 13; C.S., s. 5257; 1925, c. 179, s. 5; 1985, c. 542, s. 6.

§ 54-127.
Time of allocation.

The profits or net earnings of such association shall be allocated to those entitled thereto, at such times as the bylaws shall prescribe, which shall be as often as once in 12 months.

History.

1915, c. 144, s. 14; C.S., s. 5258; 1985, c. 542, s. 7.

§ 54-128.
Annual reports.

Every association organized under the provisions of this Subchapter shall annually, on or before the first day of March of each year, make a report to the Secretary of State; such report shall contain the name of the company, its principal place of business in this State, and generally a statement as to its business, showing total amount of business transacted, amount of capital stock subscribed for and paid in, number of shareholders, total expenses of operation, amount of indebtedness or liabilities, and its profits and losses. A copy of such report shall also be filed with the division of markets in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

1915, c. 144, s. 15; C.S., s. 5259; 1997-261, s. 109.